Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2137
Inspection; new electrical installation not in compliance with standards; disconnection; when; opportunity to correct.

If the electrical inspector finds that a new electrical installation or part of a new electrical installation that is energized is not in compliance with accepted standards of construction, he or she shall, if the installation or the noncomplying part is such as to seriously and proximately endanger human health and property, order immediate disconnection of the installation or noncomplying part. When the person responsible for making the installation so ordered disconnected is notified, he or she shall promptly proceed to make the corrections cited in the order.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 37;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-5,107;

Laws 1993, LB 193, § 29.